Georgia, session 2025_26, HB837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Probate Court of Richmond County is hereby authorized to charge and
collect a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not to
exceed $10.00 for the filing of each civil action with the court. Such technology fees shall
be used exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Probate Court of Richmond
County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware and software purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and software;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
H. B. 837
- 1 -

LC 47 3533/AP
(4) Procurement of services and equipment for the conservation of court records and
archiving the same to digital contents for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the probate court and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this
section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Richmond County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 837
- 2 -